Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE E. LEVEE IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7808. FORT BEND COUNTY LEVEE IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 7

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7808.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "District" means the Fort Bend County Levee Improvement District No. 7.

(3) "Reuse project" means a facility, improvement, appliance, appurtenance, land, interest in property, participation right, contract right, practice, technique, or technology that:

(A) facilitates the recycling and reuse of water, wastewater effluent, or other water or wastewater by-product; and

(B) results in additional water supplies for future or alternative uses.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (S.B. 1854), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 4712), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. REUSE PROJECT POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 7808.151. ACQUISITION OF REUSE PROJECT. The district may acquire a reuse project, including by purchase or lease.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (S.B. 1854), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 4712), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 7808.152. CONSTRUCTION, MAINTENANCE, AND OPERATION OF REUSE PROJECT. The district may construct, rehabilitate, repair, improve, enlarge, operate, and maintain a reuse project.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (S.B. 1854), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 4712), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 7808.154. CONVEYANCE OF REUSE PROJECT. If the board considers the terms appropriate and favorable to the district, the district may convey a reuse project to a:

(1) municipality in whose extraterritorial jurisdiction all or part of the district is located; or

(2) political subdivision located wholly or partly in the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (S.B. 1854), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 4712), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 7808.155. USE OF REUSE PROJECT WATER. If the board considers the terms appropriate and favorable to the district, the district may:

(1) use the water from a reuse project; or

(2) sell or otherwise provide the water to:

(A) a homeowners' or property owners' association located in the district; or

(B) with the prior consent of a municipality described by Section 7808.154(1), any person located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of that municipality, including a political subdivision, private entity, and individual.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (S.B. 1854), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 4712), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 7808.156. REUSE PROJECT FINANCING. The district may finance a reuse project with property taxes, mandatory fees, or voluntary contributions.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (S.B. 1854), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 4712), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 7808.157. REUSE PROJECT BONDS. The district may issue bonds or other obligations for a reuse project in the manner provided by Subchapter G, Chapter 57, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (S.B. 1854), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 4712), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 7808.158. JOINT REUSE PROJECT. The district may act jointly in regard to a reuse project under an agreement or contract with any person, including a political subdivision, private entity, or individual.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (S.B. 1854), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 4712), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 7808.159. MUNICIPAL APPROVAL. (a) The plans and specifications for the construction or modification of a reuse project are subject to:

(1) the review and approval of any municipality in whose extraterritorial jurisdiction all or part of the district is located; and

(2) any ordinance, regulation, or standard criteria a municipality described by Subdivision (1) may adopt relating to the construction or operation of similar reuse projects in its corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction.

(b) The approval required by Subsection (a) must be in the form of an ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of the municipality. Approval for subsequent modifications, extensions, or repairs of a reuse project may be given in the manner the municipality customarily uses for other water supply improvements in its corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 824 (S.B. 1854), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 4712), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. CONTRACTS

Sec. 7808.201. DELIVERY METHOD. Notwithstanding the limitations provided by Sections 2269.003 and 2269.352, Government Code, for the design and construction of erosion control facilities located in or adjacent to the Brazos River and any related facility or improvement, the district may use a delivery method described by:

(1) Chapter 2269, Government Code; or

(2) Subchapter I, Chapter 49, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1200 (H.B. 4712), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2019.